Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1624
Taxes delinquent five or more years; collection; receipts; proration; remittance of state taxes to State Treasurer; how credited.

It shall be the duty of the county treasurer for each and every county, when collecting personal and real estate taxes being delinquent five years or more, to receipt for such taxes on a receipt for the fifth delinquent year. Such taxes so collected shall be prorated in proportion to the levies applicable for the year levied. All state taxes when collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and by him or her credited to the fund or funds for which the levy or levies were made, and all county funds when collected shall be placed to the credit of the county general fund; all municipal, school district, learning community, township, precinct, and special funds shall be entered in separate columns. All taxes so consolidated shall be paid in order of priority of delinquency.

Laws 1913, c. 235, § 1, p. 738;

R.S.1913, § 6469;

C.S.1922, § 5992;

C.S.1929, § 77-1814;

R.S.1943, § 77-1624;

Laws 1963, c. 454, § 1, p. 1480;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 7.